Maine, session 132, LD1605.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §320-D is enacted to read:
§320-D. Food System Protection Program
The Food System Protection Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is
established and administered by the department to provide zero-interest loans and other
resources to qualifying producers within the State, and qualifying nonprofit organizations
within the State, established for the purpose of reducing hunger and increasing food
security that have been affected by federal funding cuts and other changes to the status of
contracts and certain federal programs. The department shall establish an application
process for individuals and entities to apply for loans under the program and criteria for
eligibility and adopt rules, as necessary, for the administration of the program. Rules
adopted pursuant to this section are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.